src/scripts/Ukrainian/untranslit.foma
# Copyright (C) 2016  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Untransliteration 
a @-> а || _ ,, 
b @-> б || _ ,, 
[v|w] @-> в || _ ,, 
h @-> г || _ ,, 
g @-> ґ || _ ,, 
d @-> д || _ ,, 
{ye} @-> є || .#. _ ,, 
{ie} @-> є || \.#. _ ,, 
e @-> е || _ ,, 
{zh} @-> ж || _ ,, 
z @-> з || _ ,, 
{yi} @-> ї || .#. _ ,, 
{kh} @-> х || _ ,, 
k @-> к || _ ,, 
l @-> л || _ ,, 
m @-> м || _ ,, 
n @-> н || _ ,, 
o @-> о || _ ,, 
p @-> п || _ ,, 
r @-> р || _ ,, 
{shch} @-> щ || _ ,, 
{sh} @-> ш || _ ,, 
s @-> с || _ ,, 
t @-> т || _ ,, 
u @-> у || _ ,, 
f @-> ф || _ ,, 
{ts} @-> ц || _ ,, 
{ch} @-> ч || _ ,, 
{yu} @-> ю || .#. _ ,, 
{iu} @-> ю || \.#. _ ,, 
{ya} @-> я || .#. _ ,, 
{ia} @-> я || \.#. _ ,, 
y @-> и || _ ,, 
i @-> і || _ ,, 
c @-> ц || _ ,, 
j @-> ж || _ ,, 
q @-> {ку} || _ ,, 
x @-> {кс} || _ ; 

regex Untransliteration ; 
